Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 7. Administrative Procedures.

Sec. 06.55.701.
Administrative proceedings.

All administrative proceedings under this chapter shall be conducted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), except that hearings shall be conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.702.
Hearings.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

06.55.603

and

06.55.607

and in (b) of this section, the department may not suspend or revoke a money services license, place a money services licensee in receivership, issue an order to cease and desist, suspend or revoke the designation of an authorized delegate, or assess a civil penalty without notice and an opportunity to be heard. The department shall also hold a hearing when requested to hold a hearing by an applicant whose application for a money services license is denied.

Under AS

06.55.106(c)

and

06.55.204(c)

, the department may suspend a money services license without a hearing unless the money services licensee requests a hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.703.
Investigative powers.

In its investigations under this chapter, the department may administer oaths or affirmations and, on its own motion or on the request of a party to a proceeding, may subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of material that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of books, documents, and other tangible items, and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or other material reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

If a person fails without a lawful excuse to obey a subpoena, and after reasonable notice to all persons affected by the failure, the department may apply to the superior court for an order compelling the person to obey the subpoena.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)